District of Columbia statutes.
8-1851.01

Animals kept in schools.

Only animals of appropriate size and temperament suitable to a classroom environment shall be introduced into the classroom. Use of such animals shall be for instructional purposes only.

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 501, 55 DCR 9186